Florida, session 2026, HB633.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
56
57 Section 1. Subsections (2), (3), and (9) of section
58 514.0115, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
59 514.0115 Exemptions from supervision or regulation;
60 variances.—
61 (2)(a) Pools serving no more than 32 condominium or
62 cooperative units which are not operated as a public lodging
63 establishment are shall be exempt from supervision under this
64 chapter, except for maintaining compliance with department rules
65 relating to water quality and a yearly inspection to confirm
66 that sanitary and entrapment standards are being met, including
67 all of the following:
68 1. The pool is compliant with the federal Virginia Graeme
69 Baker Pool and Spa Safety Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 8001 et seq.
70 2. The pool is being operated at the designed and
71 permitted flow rate.
72 3. The pool filtration system capacity is equal to or
73 greater than originally designed, is using the same filter media
74 as originally designed, and is being operated as originally
75 designed, whether as suction or pressure.
Page 3 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
76 (b) Pools serving condominium or cooperative associations
77 of more than 32 units and whose recorded documents prohibit the
78 rental or sublease of the units for periods of less than 60 days
79 are exempt from supervision under this chapter, except that the
80 condominium or cooperative owner or association must file
81 applications with the department and obtain construction plans
82 approval and receive an initial operating permit. The department
83 must shall inspect the swimming pools at such condominium or
84 cooperative associations places annually, at the fee set forth
85 in s. 514.033(3), or upon request by a unit owner, to determine
86 all of the following:
87 1. Compliance with department rules relating to water
88 quality and lifesaving equipment.
89 2. Compliance with the federal Virginia Graeme Baker Pool
90 and Spa Safety Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 8001 et seq.
91 3. That the pool is being operated at the designed and
92 permitted flow rate.
93 4. That the pool filtration system is in place and being
94 operated as originally engineered and permitted.
95
96 The department may not require compliance with rules relating to
97 swimming pool lifeguard standards.
98 (3) Pools serving homeowners' associations and other
99 property associations which have no more than 32 units or
100 parcels and are not operated as public lodging establishments
Page 4 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
101 are exempt from supervision under this chapter, except for the
102 following:
103 (a) Supervision necessary to ensure water quality and
104 compliance with s. 514.0315.
105 (b) A yearly inspection to confirm sanitary and entrapment
106 standards are being met, including all of the following:
107 1. The pool is compliant with the federal Virginia Graeme
108 Baker Pool and Spa Safety Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 8001 et seq.
109 2. The pool is being operated at the designed and
110 permitted flow rate.
111 3. The pool filtration system capacity is equal to or
112 greater than originally designed, is using the same filter media
113 as originally designed, and is being operated as originally
114 designed, whether as suction or pressure.
115 (c) Such pools, and are subject to ss. 514.05 and 514.06.
116 (9) The Public Swimming Pool and Spa Technical Committee
117 established under s. 514.028 department may grant variances from
118 any department rule adopted under this chapter pursuant to
119 procedures adopted by department rule. The committee department
120 may also grant, pursuant to procedures adopted by department
121 rule, variances from the provisions of the Florida Building Code
122 specifically pertaining to public swimming pools and bathing
123 places when requested by the pool owner or the pool owner's
124 representative to relieve hardship in cases involving deviations
125 from the Florida Building Code provisions, when it is shown that
Page 5 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
126 the hardship was not caused intentionally by the action of the
127 applicant, where no reasonable alternative exists, and the
128 health and safety of the pool patrons is not at risk. The
129 committee has sole authority to review and approve variances
130 under this section.
131 Section 2. Section 514.021, Florida Statutes, is amended
132 to read:
133 514.021 Department and Public Swimming Pool and Spa
134 Technical Committee authorization; certification.—
135 (1) The Public Swimming Pool and Spa Technical Committee
136 established under s. 514.028 shall adopt and the department
137 shall may adopt and enforce rules for the operation of public
138 swimming pools and bathing places to protect the health, safety,
139 or welfare of persons by setting sanitation and safety standards
140 for such public swimming pools and public bathing places. The
141 department shall review and revise such rules as necessary, but
142 not less than biennially. Sanitation and safety standards must
143 shall be limited to matters relating to source of water supply;
144 microbiological, chemical, and physical quality of water in the
145 pool or bathing area; and method of water purification,
146 treatment, and disinfection; lifesaving apparatus; and measures
147 to ensure safety of bathers.
148 (2) The department or committee may not establish by rule
149 any regulation governing the design, construction, erection,
150 alteration, renovation, modification, or repair, or demolition
Page 6 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
151 of public swimming pools and bathing places which has no impact
152 on sanitation and safety of persons using public swimming pools
153 and bathing places. Further, the department may not adopt by
154 rule any regulation governing the construction, erection, or
155 demolition of public swimming pools and bathing places. It is
156 the intent of the Legislature to preempt those functions to the
157 Florida Building Commission through adoption and maintenance of
158 the Florida Building Code. The department shall provide
159 technical assistance to the commission in updating the
160 construction standards of the Florida Building Code which govern
161 public swimming pools. This subsection does not abrogate the
162 authority of the department to adopt and enforce appropriate
163 sanitary regulations and requirements as authorized in
164 subsection (1).
165 (3)(a) An employee of the department responsible for the
166 inspection and regulation of public swimming pools or bathing
167 places must do all of the following:
168 1. Obtain the Florida Public Pool Specialist Certification
169 within 60 days after he or she is hired or assigned to the
170 inspection and regulation of such pools or bathing places.
171 2. Maintain such certification for the duration of his or
172 her employment or assignment to inspect and regulate public
173 swimming pools or bathing places.
174 3. Renew his or her certification every 5 years.
175 (b) The department is responsible for the cost of
Page 7 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
176 certifying its employees and renewing such certification under
177 this subsection.
178 Section 3. Subsection (4) is added to section 514.025,
179 Florida Statutes, to read:
180 514.025 Assignment of authority to county health
181 departments.—
182 (4)(a) An employee of a county health department
183 responsible for the inspection and regulation of public swimming
184 pools or bathing places must do all of the following:
185 1. Obtain the Florida Public Pool Specialist Certification
186 within 60 days after he or she is hired or assigned to the
187 inspection and regulation of such pools or bathing places.
188 2. Maintain such certification for the duration of his or
189 her employment or assignment to inspect and regulate public
190 swimming pools or bathing places.
191 3. Renew his or her certification every 5 years.
192 (b) The county health department is responsible for the
193 cost of certifying its employees and renewing such certification
194 under this subsection.
195 Section 4. Section 514.028, Florida Statutes, is amended
196 to read:
197 514.028 Public Swimming Pool and Spa Technical Committee
198 Advisory review board.—
199 (1) The Public Swimming Pool and Spa Technical Committee
200 is created with the department.
Page 8 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
201 (2)(1) The Governor shall appoint members to the Public
202 Swimming Pool and Spa Technical Committee, an advisory review
203 board which must shall meet as necessary or at least bi-monthly,
204 but may meet more frequently, if necessary, to review and act on
205 variance applications pursuant to s. 514.0115 quarterly, to
206 recommend agency action on variance request, rule and policy
207 development, and other technical review problems. The committee
208 must board shall be comprised of:
209 (a) Three licensed commercial pool and spa contractors as
210 defined in s. 489.105(3)(j) A representative from the office of
211 licensure and certification of the department.
212 (b) Two licensed swimming pool and spa servicing
213 contractors as defined in s. 489.105(3)(l) A representative from
214 the county health departments.
215 (c) Two professional engineers licensed under chapter 471
216 and practicing in this state Three representatives from the
217 swimming pool construction industry.
218 (d) Two representatives A representative from the public
219 lodging industry.
220 (e) A representative from a county or local building
221 department.
222 (3)(2) The purpose of the committee advisory review board
223 is to:
224 (a) Consider and adopt modifications to rules for the
225 operation of public swimming pools and public bathing places
Page 9 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
226 pursuant to s. 514.021(1).
227 (b) Review and act on variance applications pursuant to s.
228 514.0115.
229 (4) Notwithstanding s. 120.54, the committee must hold a
230 public workshop for the development or modification of each rule
231 proposed under s. 514.021. Notice of the public workshop and
232 proposed rule must be published in the Florida Administrative
233 Register at least 45 days before the date on which the workshop
234 is scheduled promote better relations, understanding, and
235 cooperation between such industries and the department; to
236 review and make recommendations regarding department product
237 approval standards; to suggest means of better protecting the
238 health, welfare, or safety of persons using the services offered
239 by such industries; and to give the department the benefit of
240 the knowledge and experience of the board concerning the
241 industries and individual businesses affected by the laws and
242 rules administered by the department.
243 (5)(3) Members shall be reimbursed under s. 112.061 for
244 travel expenses incurred in connection with service on the
245 Public Swimming Pool and Spa Technical Committee advisory review
246 board pursuant to s. 112.061.
247 Section 5. Section 514.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to
248 read:
249 514.03 Approval necessary to construct, develop, or modify
250 public swimming pools or public bathing places.—
Page 10 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
251 (1) A person or public body desiring to construct,
252 develop, or modify a public swimming pool must submit an
253 application, containing the information required under s.
254 514.031(1)(a) s. 514.031(1)(a)1.-6. to the department for an
255 operating permit before filing an application for a building
256 permit under s. 553.79. A copy of the final inspection required
257 under s. 514.031(1)(a)5. must shall be submitted to the
258 department upon receipt by the applicant. The application is
259 shall be deemed incomplete under pursuant to s. 120.60 until
260 such copy is submitted to the department.
261 (2) Local governments or local enforcement districts shall
262 may determine compliance with the general construction standards
263 of the Florida Building Code, pursuant to s. 553.80. Local
264 governments or local enforcement districts may conduct plan
265 reviews and inspections of public swimming pools and public
266 bathing places for this purpose.
267 (3)(a) The department, local governments, and local
268 enforcement districts may not require the submission of
269 engineering or reengineering plans in order to replace equipment
270 of a pool, a spa pool, a wading pool, or an interactive water
271 feature as long as the replacement equipment meets the flow,
272 filtration, and sanitation specifications as originally
273 designed, regardless of the type, make, or model of the
274 replacement equipment.
275 (b) The licensed commercial pool or spa contractor or
Page 11 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
276 licensed swimming pool or spa servicing contractor, as those
277 terms are defined in s. 489.105(3)(j) and (l), performing the
278 equipment replacement is responsible for certifying that the
279 replacement equipment meets the flow, filtration, and sanitation
280 specifications as originally designed.
281 Section 6. Subsection (1) of section 514.031, Florida
282 Statutes, is amended to read:
283 514.031 Permit necessary to operate public swimming pool.—
284 (1) It is unlawful for any person or public body to
285 operate or continue to operate any public swimming pool without
286 a valid permit from the department, such permit to be obtained
287 in the following manner:
288 (a) Any person or public body desiring to operate any
289 public swimming pool shall file an application for an operating
290 permit with the department, on application forms provided by the
291 department, and shall accompany such application with:
292 1. A description of the structure, its appurtenances, and
293 its operation.
294 2. A description of the source or sources of water supply,
295 and the amount and quality of water available and intended to be
296 used.
297 3. The method and manner of water purification, treatment,
298 disinfection, and heating.
299 4. The safety equipment and standards to be used.
300 5. A copy of the final inspection from the local
Page 12 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
301 enforcement agency as defined in s. 553.71.
302 6. Any other pertinent information deemed necessary by the
303 department.
304 (b) The applicant shall respond to a request for
305 additional information due to an incomplete application for an
306 operating permit pursuant to s. 120.60. Upon receipt of an
307 application, whether complete or incomplete, as required in s.
308 514.03 and as set forth under this section, the department shall
309 review and provide to the local enforcement agency and the
310 applicant any comment or proposed modifications on the
311 information received pursuant to subparagraphs (a)1.-5 (a)1.-6.
312 (c) The department must grant the application for permit
313 unless If the department determines, by clear and convincing
314 evidence, that the public swimming pool will not is or may
315 reasonably be expected to be operated in compliance with this
316 chapter and the rules adopted hereunder, The department shall
317 grant the application for permit.
318 (d) If the department determines, by clear and convincing
319 evidence, that the public swimming pool does not meet the
320 provisions outlined in this chapter or the rules adopted
321 hereunder, the department must shall deny the application for a
322 permit pursuant to the provisions of chapter 120. Such denial
323 must shall be in writing and shall list the circumstances for
324 the denial, including the specific provisions of this chapter or
325 the rules adopted hereunder that are the basis for such denial.
Page 13 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 633 2026
326 Upon correction of such circumstances, an applicant previously
327 denied permission to operate a public swimming pool or bathing
328 place may reapply for a permit.
329 Section 7. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 14 of 14
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb633-00